Illinois, session 104th, HB1650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-55 and by adding Section 5-132 6as follows: 7    (5 ILCS 100/5-55)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1005-55)8    Sec. 5-55. Automatic repeal of rules. 9    (a) A rule may provide for its automatic repeal on a date 10specified in the rule. The repeal shall be effective on the 11date specified, provided that notice of the repeal is 12published in the Illinois Register not less than 30 nor more 13than 60 days before the effective date of the repeal. This 14Section does not apply to any rules filed under Section 5-45.15    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 16unless a rule provides for its automatic repeal on an earlier 17date as specified under subsection (a), a rule is 18automatically repealed on the date that is 10 years after it 19first becomes effective, except as provided under Section 205-132. Notice of the repeal shall be published in the Illinois 21Register not less than 30 nor more than 60 days before the 22effective date of the automatic repeal under this subsection. 23For the purposes of this subsection, for each rule subject to   HB1650- 2 -LRB104 07185 BDA 17222 b1this subsection that first became effective more than 5 years 2before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 3General Assembly, the date the rule first became effective 4shall be the date that is 5 years before the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.6(Source: P.A. 87-823.) 7    (5 ILCS 100/5-132 new)8    Sec. 5-132. Sunset supervision.9    (a) The Joint Committee on Administrative Rules, in 10consultation with the Auditor General, shall submit, within 12 11months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12104th General Assembly, a report to the Governor and the 13General Assembly that determines under subsection (b) of 14Section 55 the effective date and automatic repeal date of 15every rule contained within the Illinois Administrative Code.16    (b) The General Assembly and the Governor may provide for 17the readoption of any rule subject to automatic repeal under 18subsection (b) of Section 5-55 by the passage of a bill and 19enactment of a law under Sections 8 and 9 of Article IV of the 20Constitution of the State of Illinois. No State agency may 21adopt a rule that was repealed under subsection (b) of Section 225-55 unless authorized by the subsequent passage of a bill and 23enactment of a law under Sections 8 and 9 of Article IV of the 24Constitution of the State of Illinois.25    (c) The Joint Committee shall implement and supervise the   HB1650- 3 -LRB104 07185 BDA 17222 b1automatic repeal of rules under Section 5-55 and this Section. 2Beginning 12 months after the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Joint 4Committee shall report quarterly to the Governor and the 5General Assembly regarding the implementation of this 6amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.